tr: Ekşi krema çeşidi: Crème fraîche; Ekstra yoğun/çifte krema; Aromalı; Meksika kreması; Normal; Diğer
th: ครีมเปรี้ยวหลากหลายชนิด: เครมแฟรช; ครีมเข้มข้นพิเศษ / ดับเบิลครีม; แต่งกลิ่นรส; ครีมเม็กซิกัน; ธรรมดา; อื่นๆ
sv: Gräddfilssort: Crème fraîche; Extra tjock / double cream; Smaksatt; Mexikansk crema; Vanlig; Annat
it: Varietà di panna acida: Crème fraîche; Panna extra densa / doppia; Aromatizzata; Crema messicana; Classica; Altro
cs: Druh zakysané smetany: Crème fraîche; Extra hustá / tučná smetana; Ochucená; Mexická crema; Běžná; Jiné
el: Ποικιλία ξινής κρέμας: Crème fraîche; Πολύ πηχτή / διπλή κρέμα; Με γεύση; Μεξικάνικη κρέμα; Κανονική; Άλλο
fr: Variété de crème acidulée: Crème fraîche; Crème très épaisse / double; Aromatisée; Crème mexicaine; Classique; Autre
hu: Tejföl fajtája: Crème fraîche; Extra sűrű / dupla tejszín; Ízesített; Mexikói crema; Normál; Egyéb
de: Sauerrahm-Art: Crème fraîche; Doppelrahm; Aromatisiert; Mexikanische Crema; Normal; Sonstige
hr-HR: Raznolikost kiselog vrhnja: Crème fraîche; Ekstra gusto / dvostruko vrhnje; S okusom; Meksičko vrhnje (crema); Obično; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta kisle smetane: Crème fraîche; Izjemno gosta/dvojna smetana; Z okusom; Mehiška crema; Običajno; Drugo
vi: Loại kem chua: Crème fraîche; Kem đặc / kem béo; Có hương vị; Mexican crema; Thường; Khác
zh-TW: 酸奶油種類: 法式酸奶油; 特濃 / 雙倍鮮奶油; 調味; 墨西哥酸奶油; 一般; 其他
ko: 사워크림 종류: 크렘 프레슈; 엑스트라 틱/더블 크림; 가향; 멕시칸 크레마; 일반; 기타
zh-CN: 酸奶油品种: 法式酸奶油; 特浓/双倍奶油; 风味; 墨西哥酸奶油; 常规; 其他
es: Variedad de crema agria: Crème fraîche; Extra espesa/doble crema; Saborizada; Crema mexicana; Regular; Otro
sk-SK: Druh kyslej smotany: Crème fraîche; Veľmi hustá smotana/dvojitá smotana; Ochutená; Mexican crema; Klasická; Iná
ja: サワークリームの種類: クレームフレッシュ; 特濃/ダブルクリーム; 風味付き; メキシカンクレマ; レギュラー; その他
ru: Разновидность сметаны: Крем-фреш; Очень густая сметана / двойные сливки; С вкусовыми добавками; Мексиканская крема; Обычная; Другое
en: Sour cream variety: Creme fraiche; Extra thick / double cream; Flavored; Mexican crema; Regular; Other
nb: Rømmevariant: Crème fraîche; Ekstra tykk / dobbel fløte; Med smak; Meksikansk crema; Vanlig; Annet
pt-PT: Variedade de natas ácidas: Crème fraîche; Natas espessas/natas duplas; Aromatizado; Crema mexicana; Normal; Outro
nl: Zure room variëteit: Crème fraîche; Extra dik / double cream; Gearomatiseerd; Mexicaanse crema; Regulier; Overige
pt-BR: Creme de leite azedo variedade: Crème fraîche; Creme de leite extra espesso / Double cream; Saborizado; Creme mexicano; Normal; Outros
ro-RO: Sortiment de smântână: Crème fraîche; Foarte grasă/smântână dublă; Cu arome; Smântână mexicană (crema); Standard; Altele
pl: Odmiana śmietany: Crème fraîche; Bardzo gęsta / podwójna śmietana; Smakowa; Meksykańska śmietana; Zwykła; Inne
lt-LT: Grietinės rūšis: Šviežia grietinėlė („Crème fraîche“); Ypač tiršta / riebi grietinėlė; Pagardinta; Meksikietiška grietinėlė („Crema“); Įprasta; Kita
bg-BG: Вид заквасена сметана: Крем фреш; Много гъста/двойна сметана; Овкусена; Мексиканска крема; Обикновена; Друго
fi: Smetanatyyppi: Crème fraîche; Erittäin paksu / rasvainen kerma; Maustettu; Meksikolainen crema; Tavallinen; Muu
da: Cremefraiche-type: Creme fraiche; Ekstra tyk/double cream; Med smag; Mexicansk crema; Almindelig; Andet